Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1651.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 492, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 492. A. Every person shall be regarded as practicing
allopathic medicine within the meaning and provisions of this act,
who shall append to his or her name the letters “M.D.”, “Physician”
or any other title, letters or designation which represent that such
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 2

person is a physician, or who shall for a fee or any form of
compensation diagnose and/or or treat disease, injury or deformity
of persons in this state by any allopathic legend drugs, surgery,
manual, or mechanical treatment unless otherwise authorized by law.
B. A hospital or related institution as such terms are defined
in Section 1-701 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, which has the
principal purpose or function of providing hospital or medical care,
including, but not limited to, any corporation, association, trust,
or other organization organized and operated for such purpose, may
employ one or more persons who are duly licensed to practice
medicine in this state without being regarded as itself practicing
medicine within the meaning and provisions of this section. The
employment by the hospital or related institution of any person who
is duly licensed to practice medicine in this state shall not, in
and of itself, be considered as an act of unprofessional conduct by
the person so employed. Nothing provided herein shall eliminate,
limit, or restrict the liability for any act or failure to act of
any hospital, any hospital’s employees, or persons duly licensed to
practice medicine.
C. The definition of the practice of medicine and surgery shall
include, but is not limited to:
1. Advertising, holding out to the public, or representing in
any manner that one is authorized to practice medicine and surgery
in this state;
2. Any offer or attempt to prescribe, order, give, or
administer any drug or medicine and surgery for the use of any other
person, except as otherwise authorized by law;
3. a. any Any offer or attempt, except as otherwise
authorized by law, to prevent, diagnose, correct, or
treat in any manner or by any means, methods, devises,
or instrumentalities except for manual manipulation
any disease, illness, pain, wound, fracture,
infirmity, defect, or abnormal physical or mental
condition of any person, including the management of
pregnancy and parturition, except as otherwise
authorized by law,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 3

b. except Except as provided in subsection D of this
section, performance by a person within or outside of
this state, through an ongoing regular arrangement, of
diagnostic or treatment services, including, but not
limited to, stroke prevention and treatment, through
electronic communications for any patient whose
condition is being diagnosed or treated within this
state by a physician duly licensed and practicing in
this state. A person who performs any of the
functions covered by this subparagraph submits himself
or herself to the jurisdiction of the courts of this
state for the purposes of any cause of action
resulting from the functions performed, and
c. nothing Nothing in the Oklahoma Allopathic Medical and
Surgical Licensure and Supervision Act shall be
construed to affect or give jurisdiction to the State
Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision over any
person other than medical doctors or persons holding
themselves out as medical doctors;
4. Any offer or attempt to perform any surgical operation upon
any person, except as otherwise authorized by law; and
5. The use of the title Doctor of Medicine, Physician, Surgeon,
Physician and Surgeon, Dr., M.D. or any combination thereof in the
conduct of any occupation or profession pertaining to the
prevention, diagnosis, or treatment of human disease or condition
unless, where appropriate, such a designation additionally contains
the description of another branch of the healing arts for which one
holds a valid license in this state.
D. The practice of medicine and surgery, as defined in this
section, shall not include:
1. A student while engaged in training in a medical school
approved by the Board or while engaged in graduate medical training
under the supervision of the medical staff of a hospital or other
health care facility approved by the state medical board Board for
such training, except that a student engaged in graduate medical
training shall hold a license issued by the Board for such training;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 4

2. Any person who provides medical treatment in cases of
emergency where no fee or other consideration is contemplated,
charged or received;
3. A commissioned medical officer of the armed forces Armed
Forces of the United States or medical officer of the United States
Public Health Service or the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs of the United States in the discharge of official duties
and/or or within federally controlled facilities; and provided that
such person shall be fully licensed to practice medicine and surgery
in one or more jurisdictions of the United States; provided further,
that such person who holds a medical license in this state shall be
subject to the provisions of the Oklahoma Allopathic Medical and
Surgical Licensure and Supervision Act;
4. Any person licensed under any other act when properly
practicing in the healing art for which that person is duly
licensed;
5. The practice of those who endeavor to prevent or cure
disease or suffering by spiritual means or prayer;
6. Any person administering a domestic or family remedy to a
member of such person’s own family;
7. Any person licensed to practice medicine and surgery in
another state or territory of the United States who:
a. renders emergency medical treatment or,
b. briefly provides critical medical service at the
specific lawful direction of a medical institution or
federal agency that assumes full responsibility for
that treatment or service and is approved by the
Board, or
c. renders emergency medical treatment at a sporting
event for members of the team the physician is
employed or contracted by;
8. Any person who is licensed to practice medicine and surgery
in another state or territory of the United States whose sole
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 5

purpose and activity is limited to brief actual consultation with a
specific physician who is licensed to practice medicine and surgery
by the Board, other than a person with a special or restricted
license; or
9. The practice of any other person as licensed by appropriate
agencies of this state, provided that such duties are consistent
with the accepted standards of the person’s profession and the
person does not represent himself or herself as a Doctor of
Medicine, Physician, Surgeon, Physician and Surgeon, Dr., M.D., or
any combination thereof.
E. Nothing in the Oklahoma Allopathic Medical and Surgical
Licensure and Supervision Act shall prohibit:
1. The service rendered by a physician’s unlicensed trained
assistant, if such service is rendered under the supervision and
control of a licensed physician pursuant to Board rules, provided
such rules are not in conflict with the provisions of any other
healing arts licensure act or rules promulgated pursuant to such
act; or
2. The service of any other person duly licensed or certified
by the state to practice the healing arts.
F. Nothing in the Oklahoma Allopathic Medical and Surgical
Licensure and Supervision Act shall prohibit services rendered by
any person not licensed by the Board and practicing any
nonallopathic non-allopathic healing practice.
G. Nothing in the Oklahoma Allopathic Medical and Surgical
Licensure and Supervision Act shall be construed as to require a
physician to secure a Maintenance of Certification (MOC) as a
condition of licensure, reimbursement, employment or admitting
privileges at a hospital in this state. For the purposes of this
subsection, “Maintenance of Certification (MOC)” shall mean a
continuing education program measuring core competencies in the
practice of medicine and surgery and approved by a nationally-
recognized nationally recognized accrediting organization.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 6

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 493.1, as
amended by Section 2, Chapter 350, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 493.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 493.1. A. An applicant to practice medicine and
surgery in this state shall provide to the State Board of Medical
Licensure and Supervision and attest to the following information
and documentation in a manner required by the Board:
1. The applicant’s full name and all aliases or other names
ever used, current address, Social Security number, and date and
place of birth;
2. A photograph of the applicant, taken within the previous
twelve (12) months;
3. All documents and credentials required by the Board, or
notarized photocopies or other verification acceptable to the Board
of such documents and credentials;
4. 3. A list of all jurisdictions, United States or foreign, in
which the applicant is licensed or has applied for licensure to
practice medicine and surgery or is authorized or has applied for
authorization to practice medicine and surgery;
5. 4. A list of all jurisdictions, United States or foreign, in
which the applicant has been denied licensure or authorization to
practice medicine and surgery or has voluntarily surrendered a
license or an authorization to practice medicine and surgery;
6. 5. A list of all sanctions, judgments, awards, settlements,
or convictions against the applicant in any jurisdiction, United
States or foreign, that would constitute grounds for disciplinary
action under the Oklahoma Allopathic Medical and Surgical Licensure
and Supervision Act or the Board’s rules;
7. 6. A detailed educational history, including places,
institutions, dates, and program descriptions, of all his or her
education, including all college, preprofessional, professional, and
professional graduate education;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 7

8. 7. A detailed chronological history from age eighteen (18)
years graduation from medical school to the present, including
employment, military service (United States or foreign), and all
professional degrees, licenses, or certificates now or ever held;
and
9. 8. Any other information or documentation specifically
requested by the Board that is related to the applicant’s ability to
practice medicine and surgery.
B. The applicant shall possess a valid degree of Doctor of
Medicine from a medical college or school located in the United
States, its territories or possessions, or Canada that was approved
by the Board or by a private nonprofit accrediting body approved by
the Board at the time the degree was conferred. The application
shall be considered by the Board based upon the product and process
of the medical education and training.
C. The applicant shall have satisfactorily completed twelve
(12) months of progressive postgraduate medical training as
promulgated by rule by the Board. The Board shall consider as
evidence of acceptability the sponsoring institution’s accreditation
by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education (ACGME),
the American Society of Transplant Surgeons (ASTS), the Royal
College of Physicians and Surgeons of Canada, the College of Family
Physicians of Canada, the Royal College of Surgeons of Edinburgh,
the Royal College of Surgeons of England, the Royal College of
Physicians and Surgeons of Glasgow, or the Royal College of Surgeons
in Ireland.
D. The applicant shall submit a history from the administration
of the any medical school from which the applicant graduated
attended of any suspension, probation, or disciplinary action taken
against the applicant while a student at that institution.
E. The applicant shall have passed medical licensing
examination(s) consistent with policies and procedures regarding the
number of medical licensure exam attempts as established by the
United States Medical Licensing Examination program unless granted
an exception by the Board.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 8

F. The applicant shall have demonstrated a familiarity with all
appropriate statutes and rules and regulations of this state and the
federal government relating to the practice of medicine and surgery.
G. The applicant shall be physically, mentally, professionally,
and morally capable of practicing medicine and surgery in a manner
reasonably acceptable to the Board and in accordance with federal
law and shall be required to submit to a physical, mental, or
professional competency examination or a drug dependency evaluation
if deemed necessary by the Board.
H. The applicant shall not have committed or been found guilty
by a competent authority, United States or foreign, of any conduct
that would constitute grounds for disciplinary action under the
Oklahoma Allopathic Medical and Surgical Licensure and Supervision
Act or rules of the Board. The Board may modify this restriction
for cause.
I. Upon request by the Board, the applicant shall make a
personal appearance before the Board or a representative thereof for
interview, examination, or review of credentials. At the discretion
of the Board, the applicant shall be required to present his or her
original medical education credentials for inspection during the
personal appearance.
J. The applicant shall be held responsible for verifying to the
satisfaction of the Board the identity of the applicant and the
validity of all credentials required for his or her medical
licensure. The Board may review and verify medical credentials and
screen applicant records through recognized national physician
information services.
K. The applicant shall have paid all fees and completed and
attested to the accuracy of all application and information forms
required by the Board.
L. Grounds for the denial of a license shall include:
1. Use of false or fraudulent information by an applicant;
2. Suspension or revocation of a license in another state
unless the license has been reinstated in that state;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 9

3. Refusal of licensure in another state other than for
examination failure; and
4. Multiple examination failures.
M. The Board shall not deny a license to a person otherwise
qualified to practice allopathic medicine within the meaning of the
Oklahoma Allopathic Medical and Surgical Licensure and Supervision
Act solely because the person’s practice or a therapy is
experimental or nontraditional.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 493.2, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 61, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 493.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 493.2. A. Unless Except as otherwise provided by this
section, foreign applicants and international medical school
graduate applicants shall otherwise meet all requirements for full
and unrestricted licensure as provided in Sections 492.1 and 493.1
of this title.
B. 1. A foreign An international applicant for full and
unrestricted licensure shall possess the degree of Doctor of
Medicine or a Board-approved an equivalent approved by the State
Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision based on satisfactory
completion of educational programs from a foreign an international
medical school as evidenced by the Educational Commission for
Foreign Medical Graduates (ECFMG).
2. In the event the foreign international medical school
utilized clerkships in the United States, its territories or
possessions, such clerkships shall have been performed in hospitals
and schools that have programs accredited by the Accreditation
Council for Graduate Medical Education (ACGME).
C. 1. An international medical school graduate may apply for
limited licensure. The Board may issue a limited license of defined
duration to an international medical school graduate upon finding
sufficient evidence that the international medical school graduate
has:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 10

a. graduated from a medical school which meets the
requirements of the Educational Commission for Foreign
Medical Graduates (ECFMG), and
b. paid any application fee as set by the Board.
2. The Board shall also find sufficient evidence of the
competency of the international medical school graduate through the
following:
a. verification of successful completion of a three-year
postgraduate training program in the graduate’s
licensing country, or
b. verification that the applicant otherwise practiced as
a medical professional performing the duties of a
physician for at least three (3) of the last five (5)
years outside the United States verified by the
employer or health care provider facility.
3. An applicant under subparagraphs a and b of paragraph 1 of
this subsection shall submit sufficient evidence that the applicant
is an international medical school graduate and has an offer for
employment as a physician at a health care provider facility that
operates in this state and has a postgraduate training program
accredited by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical
Education (ACGME) in place.
4. During the term of the limited license, an international
medical school graduate who is granted a limited license under
subparagraphs a and b of paragraph 1 of this subsection shall only
provide medical services at a health care provider facility that has
in place a postgraduate training program accredited by the
Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education (ACGME).
5. An international medical school graduate who is granted a
limited license shall be supervised by the chair of the department
within the applicant’s intended practice during the term of the
limited license.
6. A limited license granted under this subsection shall be
renewed annually upon approval of the Board.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 11

7. Three (3) years after the first date the limited licensee
begins to practice medicine at a health care provider facility in
this state, the Board may grant a full and unrestricted license to
practice medicine to a limited licensee under subparagraphs a and b
of paragraph 1 of this subsection who:
a. is in good standing without disciplinary actions or
investigations pending from his or her limited
licensure period, and
b. provides documentation of a passing score for United
States Medical Licensing Examination (USMLE) Step 1, 2
CK, and 3.
7. 8. A limited licensee who obtains a full and unrestricted
license is not thereafter subject to the restriction of practicing
at a health care provider facility with a postgraduate training
program.
8. 9. As used in this subsection, “health care provider”
facility” means a facility that will be employing the licensee
within an academic health system or the Oklahoma State University
College of Osteopathic Medicine.
D. Any foreign applicant or international medical school
graduate shall have a command of the English language that is
satisfactory to the State Board of Medical Licensure and
Supervision, determined as demonstrated by certification by the
Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates (ECFMG).
E. The Board may promulgate rules requiring all foreign
international applicants to satisfactorily complete at least twelve
(12) months and up to twenty-four (24) months of Board-approved
progressive graduate medical training as determined necessary by the
Board for the protection of the public health, safety, and welfare.
F. All credentials, diplomas and other required documentation
in a foreign language submitted to the Board by such applicants
shall be accompanied by notarized English translations performed by
an institution accredited by the North Central Association of
Colleges and Schools according to the requirements of the Board.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 12

G. Foreign applicants and international International medical
school graduates shall provide satisfactory evidence of having met
the requirements for permanent residence or temporary nonimmigrant
status as set forth by the United States Immigration and
Naturalization Service Department of Homeland Security.
H. The Board requires shall require original source
verification of the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical
Graduates (ECFMG) Certification or Medical Council of Canada
Qualifying Examination (MCCQUE) Certification.
I. The applicant shall not have committed or been found guilty
by a competent authority, United States or foreign, of any conduct
that would constitute grounds for disciplinary action under this act
section or rules by the Board. The Board may modify this
restriction for cause.
J. If the applicant has not been practicing medicine for more
than two (2) years, the applicant shall be subject to Section 495h
of this title.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 493.4, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 493.4. A. No person who is granted a special license
or a special training license shall practice outside the limitations
of the license.
B. To be eligible for special or special training licensure,
the applicant shall have completed all the requirements for full and
unrestricted medical licensure except graduate education and/or,
licensing examination, or other requirements relative to the basis
for the special license or special training license.
C. By rule, the State Board of Medical Licensure and
Supervision shall establish restrictions for special and special
training licensure to assure that the holder will practice only
under appropriate circumstances as set by the Board.
D. A special license or special training license shall be
renewable annually upon the approval of the Board and upon the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 13

evaluation of performance in the special circumstances upon which
the special license or special training license was granted.
E. The issuance of a special license or a special training
license shall not be construed to imply that a full and unrestricted
medical license will be issued at a future date.
F. All other provisions of the Oklahoma Allopathic Medical and
Surgical Licensure and Supervision Act shall apply to holders of
special licenses or special training licenses.
G. This section shall not limit the authority of any state
agency or educational institution in this state which employs a
special or special training specially licensed physician to impose
additional practice limitations upon such physician.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 493.4a of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. No person who is granted a special training license for
postgraduate training shall practice outside the limitations of the
license.
B. To be eligible for a special training license for
postgraduate training, the applicant shall have completed all the
requirements for full and unrestricted medical licensure except
graduate education, licensing examination, or other requirements
relative to the basis for the special training license.
C. By rule, the State Board of Medical Licensure and
Supervision shall establish restrictions for a special training
license for postgraduate training to assure that the holder will
practice only under appropriate circumstances as set by the Board.
D. A special training license for postgraduate training shall
be renewable annually upon the approval of the Board Secretary and
upon the evaluation of performance in the special circumstances upon
which the special training license was granted.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 14

E. The issuance of a special training license for postgraduate
training shall not be construed to imply that a full and
unrestricted medical license will be issued at a future date.
F. All other provisions of the Oklahoma Allopathic Medical and
Surgical Licensure and Supervision Act shall apply to holders of
special training licenses for postgraduate training.
G. This section shall not limit the authority of any state
agency or educational institution in this state which employs a
person licensed under this section to impose additional practice
limitations upon such physician.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 493.5b of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The holder of a full and unrestricted license may choose at any
time to retire and apply for physician emeritus licensure status by
notifying the State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision.
There shall be no fee associated with obtaining or maintaining
physician emeritus licensure status. An applicant for a physician
emeritus license shall apply in a manner required by the Board.
SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 503.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 503.1. A. The Secretary of the State Board of Medical
Licensure and Supervision, upon concurrence of the President of the
Board that an emergency exists for which the immediate suspension of
a license is imperative for the public health, safety and welfare,
may conduct a hearing as contemplated by Section 314 of Title 75 of
the Oklahoma Statutes and may, upon probable cause, suspend
temporarily the license of any person under the jurisdiction of the
Board.
B. The Secretary shall comply with all notice requirements of
the Administrative Procedures Act and shall immediately set the
matter for full hearing before the Board in compliance with the
Administrative Procedures Act and the Oklahoma Allopathic Medical
and Surgical Licensure and Supervision Act.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 15

SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 529, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 529. A. There is hereby created the Athletic Trainers
Advisory Committee, to be composed of five (5) members to be
appointed by the State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision.
To qualify as a member, a person must be a citizen of the United
States and a resident of Oklahoma for five (5) years immediately
preceding appointment. Two Three members shall be licensed athletic
trainers, except for the initial appointees, and two members shall
be physicians licensed by the state and one member shall be a member
of the Oklahoma Coaches Association who shall be selected by the
Board of the Association. Except for the initial appointees,
members. Members shall hold office for terms of six (6) years. In
the event of death, resignation or removal of any member, the
vacancy of the unexpired term shall be filled by the Board in the
same manner as other appointments.
B. The Athletic Trainers Advisory Committee shall assist the
Board in conducting examinations for applicants and shall advise the
Board on all matters pertaining to the application and licensure of
athletic trainers, which shall exclude disciplinary matters.
Members of the Committee shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred
while performing their duties under the provisions of this act the
Oklahoma Athletic Trainers Act in accordance with the State Travel
Reimbursement Act.
SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 530, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 530. A. An applicant to be eligible for an athletic
trainer license must meet one of the following qualifications:
1. Has successfully completed the athletic training curriculum
requirements of an accredited college or university approved by the
Board and provide proof of graduation;
2. Be licensed or certified in physical therapy and has spent
at least eight hundred (800) hours working under the direct
supervision of a licensed athletic trainer; or
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 16

3. Holds a four-year degree from an accredited college or
university and has completed at least two (2) consecutive years of
supervision, military duty excepted, as an apprentice athletic
trainer under the direct supervision of a licensed athletic trainer.
B. An applicant for an athletic trainer license shall submit an
application to the State Board and submit the required examination
fee of Medical Licensure and Supervision. The applicant is entitled
to an athletic trainer license if he is qualified as provided in
subsection A of this section, or she satisfactorily completes the
examination administered by the Board, of the Board of Certification
for the Athletic Trainer or successor organization and pays the
applicable license fee, and has. Additionally, the applicant shall
not have committed an act which constitutes grounds for denial of a
license under Section 8 of this act the Oklahoma Athletic Trainers
Act. Applicants for renewal shall provide documentation of good
standing with the Board of Certification for the Athletic Trainer or
successor organization.
C. An applicant for an apprentice athletic trainer license must
submit an application to the Board accompanied by a written
commitment to supervise signed by the licensed athletic trainer who
will be supervising the applicant. The Board may require the taking
of an apprentice athletic trainer license examination, which would
be administered without cost to the applicant. Fees for such
examination may be established by the Board
B. The State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision may
authorize the Board Secretary to issue a temporary license to
practice prior to licensure, provided all requirements for licensure
have been met and verified. The temporary license shall terminate
on the date of the next Board meeting at which the applicant may be
considered for a license.
SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 530.1 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision is
authorized to obtain a national criminal history background check as
a condition of eligibility for individuals seeking licensure to
practice as an athletic trainer for initial licensure in this state
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 17

and pursuant to the provisions of an athletic trainer compact as a
condition for initial licensure.
B. Applicant fingerprints shall be submitted to the Oklahoma
State Bureau of Investigation (OSBI) and the national criminal
history background check shall be conducted in accordance with
Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. OSBI shall
return national criminal history results to the Board.
C. Results obtained from the national criminal history
background check shall be used solely for the screening of athletic
trainer applicants and shall be retained by the Board. The Board
shall not disseminate criminal history record information resulting
from the background check.
SECTION 11. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 531, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 531. A. A Beginning January 1, 2027, a license issued
pursuant to this act expires one (1) year from the date of issuance
the Oklahoma Athletic Trainers Act shall be renewed annually by
August 31 of each year. Licensees shall provide documentation of
current good standing with the Board of Certification for the
Athletic Trainer or successor organization for renewal. Licenses
shall be renewed according to procedures established by the State
Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision and upon payment of the
renewal fee.
B. License fees shall be established by the Board:
1. An athletic trainer examination fee of Twenty Dollars
($20.00) for each examination taken;
2. An athletic trainer license fee of Twenty-five Dollars
($25.00);
3. An athletic trainer annual license renewal fee of Ten
Dollars ($10.00); and
4. An apprentice athletic trainer license fee of Five Dollars
($5.00).
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 18

SECTION 12. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 533, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 533. Violation of any provision of this act the
Oklahoma Athletic Trainers Act shall be a misdemeanor and conviction
shall be punishable by a fine of not less than Twenty-five Dollars
($25.00) nor more than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) the State Board
of Medical Licensure and Supervision as authorized under subsection
D of Section 503.2 of this title.
SECTION 13. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 534, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 534. A. Any person actively engaged as an athletic
trainer in this state on the effective date of this act shall,
within six (6) months of that date, be issued a license if proof is
submitted of five (5) years’ experience as an athletic trainer
within the preceding ten-year period, and the license fee required
by the Oklahoma Athletic Trainers Act is paid. Nothing herein in
the Oklahoma Athletic Trainers Act shall be construed to require any
educational institution or other bona fide athletic organization to
use the services of a licensed athletic trainer.
B. Athletic trainers shall not misrepresent in any manner,
either directly or indirectly, their skills, training, professional
credentials, identity or services.
C. Any person, as authorized in accordance with Section 5 of
Title 76 of the Oklahoma Statutes, may offer prevention, emergency
care or first aid services on a voluntary, uncompensated basis, to
any amateur or group at an amateur athletic event.
SECTION 14. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 535, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 535. A. Nothing herein in the Oklahoma Athletic
Trainers Act shall be construed to authorize the practice of
medicine by any person. The provisions of this act the Oklahoma
Athletic Trainers Act do not apply to physicians licensed as such by
the State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision; to dentists,
duly qualified and registered under the laws of this state who
confine their practice strictly to dentistry as defined by this
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 19

title; nor to licensed optometrists who confine their practice
strictly to optometry as defined by law; nor to licensed
chiropractic physicians who confine their practice strictly to
chiropractic as defined by law; nor to licensed osteopathic
physicians or osteopathic physicians and surgeons who confine their
practice strictly to osteopathy as defined by law; nor to
occupational therapists who confine their practice to occupational
therapy as defined by this title; nor to nurses who practice nursing
only as defined by this title; nor to duly licensed podiatric
physicians who confine their practice strictly to podiatric medicine
as defined by law; nor to physical therapists who confine their
practice to physical therapy as defined by this title; nor to
masseurs or masseuses in their particular sphere of labor; nor to
commissioned or contract physicians or, physical therapists, or
physical therapists’ assistants; nor to athletic trainers if
supervised by an Oklahoma licensed physician in the United States
Army, Navy, Air Force, Public Health and Marine Health Services; nor
to athletic trainers employed by the United States government in the
capacity of an athletic trainer providing all of his or her
professional activities within a federal facility.
B. The provisions of this act the Oklahoma Athletic Trainers
Act shall not apply to persons coming into this state for a specific
athletic event or series of athletic events with an individual or
group not based in this state.
SECTION 15. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 540.11, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 540.11. A. Upon payment to the State Board of Medical
Licensure and Supervision of a fee as provided by the Therapeutic
Recreation Practice Act and submission of a written application on
forms provided by the Board, the Board may issue a license without
examination to any person who is licensed or otherwise certified as
a therapeutic recreation specialist by another state or national
certifying body which has substantially the same standards for
licensure as are required by this state pursuant to the provisions
of the Therapeutic Recreation Practice Act.
B. Upon proper application and payment of fees, the Board may
issue a temporary license to a person who has applied for a license
pursuant to the provisions of this act the Therapeutic Recreation
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 20

Practice Act and who is eligible to take the examination pursuant to
the provisions of this act the Therapeutic Recreation Practice Act.
The temporary license shall be available to an applicant only with
respect to his or her first application for licensure. The
temporary license shall expire upon notice that the applicant has or
has not passed the examination.
SECTION 16. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 888.7A of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision is
authorized to obtain a national criminal history background check as
a condition of eligibility for individuals seeking licensure to
practice as an occupational therapist for initial licensure in this
state and pursuant to the provisions of an occupational therapy
licensure compact as a condition for initial licensure.
B. Applicant fingerprints shall be submitted to the Oklahoma
State Bureau of Investigation (OSBI) and the national criminal
history background check shall be conducted in accordance with
Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. OSBI shall
return national criminal history results to the Board.
C. Results obtained from the national criminal history
background check shall be used solely for the screening of
occupational therapist applicants and shall be retained by the
Board. The Board shall not disseminate criminal history record
information resulting from the background check.
SECTION 17. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 889.5, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 889.5. A. Except as otherwise provided by law, the
State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision shall issue a
license to an applicant for a music therapy license when such
applicant has completed and submitted an application upon a form and
in such manner as the Board prescribes, accompanied by applicable
fees, and evidence satisfactory to the Board that the applicant:
1. Is at least eighteen (18) years of age;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 21

2. Holds a bachelor’s degree or higher in music therapy, or its
equivalent, from a program approved by the American Music Therapy
Association or any successor organization within an accredited
college or university;
3. Successfully completed a minimum of one thousand two hundred
(1,200) hours of clinical training, with at least fifteen percent
(15%) or one hundred eighty (180) hours in preinternship pre-
internship experiences, and at least seventy-five percent (75%) or
nine hundred (900) hours in internship experiences. Internship
programs may be approved by an academic institution, the American
Music Therapy Association, or both;
4. Is in good standing based on a review of the applicant’s
music therapy licensure history in other jurisdictions, including a
review of any alleged misconduct or neglect in the practice of music
therapy on the part of the applicant; and
5. Passed the examination for board certification offered by
the Certification Board for Music Therapists or any successor
organization or provides proof of being transitioned into board
certification, and the applicant is currently a board-certified
music therapist.
B. The State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision shall
issue a music therapy license to an applicant when such applicant
has completed and submitted an application upon a form and in such
manner as the Board prescribes, accompanied by applicable fees, and
evidence satisfactory to the Board that the applicant is licensed
and in good standing as a music therapist in another jurisdiction
where the qualifications required are equal to or greater than those
required in this act the Music Therapy Practice Act at the date of
application.
C. The Board shall waive the examination requirement until
January 1, 2020, for an applicant who is designated as a registered
music therapist, certified music therapist or advanced certified
music therapist and in good standing with the National Music Therapy
Registry.
D. The State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision Board
may authorize the Board Secretary to issue a temporary license to
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 22

practice under the supervision of an Oklahoma licensed music
therapist prior to licensure, provided all requirements for
licensure have been met and verified. The temporary license shall
terminate on the date of the next Board meeting at which the
applicant may be considered for a license.
E. The Board may, upon notice and opportunity for a hearing,
deny an application for reinstatement of a license or reinstate the
license with conditions. Conditions imposed may include a
requirement for continuing education, practice under the supervision
of a licensed music therapy specialist, or any other conditions
deemed appropriate by the Board.
SECTION 18. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 2033, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2033. A. The applicant, except where otherwise defined
in the Respiratory Care Practice Act, shall be required to pass an
examination, whereupon the State Board of Medical Licensure and
Supervision may issue to the applicant a license to practice
respiratory care. The Board is authorized to provide for the
examination of applicants or to facilitate verification of any
applicant’s claim that the applicant has successfully completed the
required examination for national credentialing as a respiratory
care practitioner.
B. The Board may issue a license to practice respiratory care
by endorsement to:
1. An applicant who is currently licensed to practice
respiratory care under the laws of another state, territory or
country if:
a. the qualifications of the applicant are deemed by the
Board to be equivalent to those required in this
state, and
b. the applicant has not been disciplined by agreement
not to practice or suspension or revocation of his or
her license in another state, territory, or country in
the last ten (10) years;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 23

2. Applicants holding credentials as a respiratory therapist
conferred by the National Board for Respiratory Care (NBRC) or its
successor organization as identified by the Respiratory Care
Advisory Committee and approved by the State Board of Medical
Licensure and Supervision, provided such credentials have not been
suspended or revoked; and
3. Applicants applying under the conditions of this section who
certify under oath that their credentials have not been suspended or
revoked.
SECTION 19. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 2039, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2039. The practice of respiratory care may be performed
in any clinic, physician’s office, hospital, nursing facility,
private dwelling, or other place or by telemedicine in accordance
with the prescription or verbal order of a physician, and shall be
performed under the supervision of a qualified medical director or
physician licensed to practice medicine or surgery in this state.
SECTION 20. AMENDATORY 76 O.S. 2021, Section 17, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 17. A. Whenever a claim of personal injury is made
against any practitioner of the healing arts or a licensed hospital,
a report shall be made to the appropriate licensing board or agency
by the liability insurer of such practitioner or hospital within
sixty (60) days after receipt of information that a claim is being
made. In the event that such claim is made against a party not
insured, the report shall be made by the party. The report shall be
in writing on a form containing the following information:
1. The name and address of the practitioner or hospital;
2. The name, age and address of the claimant;
3. A brief statement of the nature of the injury, illness or
condition complained of and the act or omission complained of; and
4. Whether a suit is pending and, if so, the court, style and
docket number of the action.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 24

B. And whenever such claim or suit is concluded, the
disposition shall be reported to the appropriate board or agency
promptly.
C. This report shall be privileged except as hereinafter
provided.
D. The licensing board or agency shall take any remedial,
disciplinary or corrective action as it may deem warranted by the
facts contained in the report.
E. Any person or liability insurer failing to furnish a report
on a claim as required in this section shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor.
Further, the board or agency shall annually furnish the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives a full report of all such claims except that names
and addresses of all parties shall be omitted. Such report shall
include disposition of the claim as well as a report of all action
taken by the board or agency and the reason therefor.
SECTION 21. REPEALER 59 O.S. 2021, Section 493.2, as
amended by Section 3, Chapter 350, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 493.2), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 22. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 25

Passed the Senate the 11th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1651 Page 26